Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 3. Acquisition of Federal Surplus Property.

Sec. 44.68.120.
Authority and duty of Department of Administration.

The Department of Administration may

acquire from the United States under The Federal Property and Administrative Services Act of 1949 as amended, referred to in AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

as the “Federal Act,” and other applicable federal statutes and regulations, (63 Stat. 377 et seq., 40 U.S.C.A. 471 et seq.) property under the control of a department or agency of the United States that is usable and necessary for purposes of education (including educational activities which are of special interest to the armed services), public health or civil defense, and other purposes authorized by federal law;

warehouse property acquired under (a)(1) of this section; and

distribute the property to tax-supported medical institutions, hospitals, clinics, health centers, school systems, colleges, schools, and universities in the state, to other nonprofit medical institutions, hospitals, clinics, health centers, schools, colleges, and universities exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, including future amendments, to civil defense organizations of the state established under state law, to organizations or institutions engaged in educational activities which are of special interest to the armed services, and to other types of institutions or activities eligible under federal law to acquire the property.

The Department of Administration may receive applications from the eligible institutions listed in (a)(3) of this section, including the state government and its political subdivisions, for the acquisition of federal surplus real property, investigate the applications, get an expression of views on the applications from the health or educational authorities of the state, make recommendations on applicants, needs for the property, the merits of its proposed program of use, and the suitability of the property for these purposes, and otherwise assist in the processing of applications for acquisition of real and related personal property of the United States under § 203 (k) of the Federal Act.

The Department of Administration may adopt the regulations and prescribe the requirements and take other action considered necessary to administer AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

to assure maximum use and benefit to eligible institutions and organizations in the state.

The Department of Administration may take the action, make the expenditures, and enter into contracts, agreements, and undertakings in the name of the state, including cooperative agreements with federal agencies providing for use by and exchange between them of the property, facilities, personnel, and services of each by the other, require the reports and make the investigations required by law or regulation of the United States in connection with the disposal of real property and the receipt, warehousing, and distribution of personal property received by the department from the United States.

The Department of Administration may act as clearinghouse of information for eligible institutions and organizations referred to in (a) of this section and other institutions eligible to acquire federal surplus real property, locate real and personal property available for acquisition from the United States, ascertain the terms and conditions under which the property may be obtained, receive requests from the eligible institutions and organizations, and transmit to them available information in reference to the property, and aid and assist them to acquire federal surplus property under AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

.

The Department of Administration shall cooperate with the departments or agencies of the United States and shall file a state plan of operation, operate in accordance with it, and take the action necessary to meet the minimum standards prescribed in accordance with the Federal Act, and make the reports in the form and containing the information which the United States or its departments or agencies may require and shall comply with the laws of the United States and the regulations of its departments or agencies governing the allocation, transfer, use, or accounting for property donated to the state.

The Department of Administration may perform functions necessary to carry out the transfer of federal surplus personal property for eligible purposes under Public Law 659, 1954, as amended, and to comply with regulations of the Federal General Services Administration in connection with the Federal Act. In carrying out the purposes of this subsection the department may, upon the governor’s request, act as the governor’s representative in connection with the function to be performed under AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

.

The civil defense organization, officials, and contacts throughout the state may be used to assist in carrying out the purposes of AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

to the extent that this is feasible and can be done without adversely affecting civil defense. The department may employ the assistants and other workers in the surplus property service necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 163 SLA 1957; am § 19 ch 143 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.71.020.
Renumbered in 1989.

Editor’s notes. —

The principal portions of the federal act referred to in (a) of this section are found in 40 U.S.C. 101 — 611. Other provisions are in Titles 41, 44, and 50 of the United States Code.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for the acquisition of surplus real property from the federal government, and the commissioner of the state agency submitting application to the Department of Administration for the acquisition of the property may accept the transfer of property to it and obligate the agency and its funds to the extent necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of such transfers.
The commissioner of the initiating department may delegate this function to any officer within the department. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

Sec. 44.68.130.
Financing surplus property service; special fund.

The functions of the Department of Administration under AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

shall be, to the fullest extent possible, self-supporting. Funds to pay for personal services and all other expenses necessary to operate under AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

shall be obtained from appropriations authorized under AS 44.68.120 — 44.68.140 and fees charged to users of surplus property. However, charges may not be made when property is transferred for civil defense purposes. The department shall establish the fees to be charged. Charges may be made to reimburse the department for direct costs incurred on behalf of users of surplus property.

The charges or fees imposed by the department for the acquisition, warehousing, distribution, or transfer of federal surplus property for educational, public health, or civil defense purposes, including research, and for purposes eligible under federal law are limited to those reasonably related to the costs of care and handling in respect to acquisition, receipt, warehousing, distribution, or transfer by the department. In the case of real property, the charges and fees shall be limited to the reasonable administrative costs of the department incurred in transferring the property. A reasonable reserve may be considered as a proper cost.

There is a special revolving fund in the state treasury. All fees and other money collected from users and receiving agencies shall be deposited in this fund. Administrative costs and incidental expenses shall be paid from this special fund.

History.

(§ 4 ch 163 SLA 1957)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.71.030. Renumbered in 1989.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to special funds, see AS

37.05.500

.

Sec. 44.68.140.
Authorization to accept property.

The governing board, or the executive head of a department, instrumentality, or agency of the state government or of a town, city, school district, or other political subdivision may, by order or resolution, give an officer or employee of it continuing authority to get, certify, and accept the transfer to it of property under AS

44.68.120

—

44.68.140

, and to obligate the authority for which the officer or employee acts and its funds to the extent necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the transfers.
This authority of an officer or employee remains in effect until the order or resolution is revoked and written notice of revocation is received by the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 5 ch 163 SLA 1957)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.71.040. Renumbered in 1989.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for the acquisition of surplus real property from the federal government, and the commissioner of the state agency submitting application to the Department of Administration for the acquisition of the property may accept the transfer of property to it and obligate the agency and its funds to the extent necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of such transfers.
The commissioner of the initiating department may delegate this function to any officer within the department. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

This section contemplated that the Alaska Surplus Supply Service (now the Department of Administration) would negotiate the contract, but that the territorial (now state) agency making application for the acquisition of the property, acting through a duly authorized officer or employee, should be bound on the contract. 1962 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.